Utah statutes.
58-17b-308.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

(2)  The duration of a pharmacy intern license may be no longer than:

(a)  one year for a license issued under Subsection 58-17b-304(7)(b) or (c); or

(b)  five years for a license issued under Subsection 58-17b-304(7)(a).

(3)  A pharmacy intern license issued under this chapter may not be renewed, but may be extended by the division in collaboration with the board.

